Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB177.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 214 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any COVID-19 vaccine, modified ribonucleic acid (modRNA) vaccine, or
messenger ribonucleic acid (mRNA) vaccine shall not be required for any
individual for the purposes of student enrollment, employment, or medical
treatment in the Commonwealth.
(2) No COVID-19 vaccine, modified ribonucleic acid (modRNA) vaccine, or
messenger ribonucleic acid (mRNA) vaccine shall be administered in the
Commonwealth to a minor child under the age of eighteen (18) years.
(3) The provisions of subsection (2) of this section that apply to a minor child under
the age of eighteen (18) years shall expire on July 1, 2035, unless extended by an
act of the General Assembly following legislative review of available safety data.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:17 PM Jacketed